Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.010

Application of chapter—Exceptions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The provisions of this title relating to the financing of election campaigns shall apply in all election campaigns other than (1) for precinct committee officer; (2) for a federal elective office; and (3) for an office of a political subdivision of the state that does not encompass a whole county and that contains fewer than 5,000 registered voters as of the date of the most recent general election in the subdivision, unless required by RCW 29B.20.070 (2) through (5) and (7).

[ 2024 c 164 s 418; 2010 c 204 s 401; 2006 c 240 s 1; 1987 c 295 s 18; 1986 c 12 s 1; 1985 c 367 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 313 s 2; 1973 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 276, approved November 7, 1972). Formerly RCW 42.17A.200, 42.17.030.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 313: "This 1977 amendatory act shall take effect on January 1, 1978." [ 1977 ex.s. c 313 s 9.]

Effective date—Construction—1973 c 1: See notes following RCW 29B.05.010.

Cemetery district commissioners exempt from chapter: RCW 68.52.140, 68.52.220.